Idaho, session 2025, S1181.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT. Public defense is an es-
sential government service, and the Legislature is committed to fulfilling
the state's responsibility to provide a legal defense for certain indigent
defendants. In fulfilling this responsibility, the Legislature is equally
committed to the responsible and conscientious use of taxpayer resources.
To assist in ensuring that funds appropriated to the Office of the State Pub-
lic Defender are used efficiently and effectively, the Legislature hereby
directs that the Office of the State Public Defender include the following in
its fiscal year 2027 budget request:
(1) A proposed statewide facilities transition plan that shall include
a phased-in schedule for transitioning from county-provided facilities to
state-owned or state-leased facilities during the period of July 1, 2027,
through July 1, 2029. Such plan shall prioritize first transitioning to
state-owned or state-leased facilities in those counties determined by the
State Public Defender, in consultation with the respective district public
defenders and county commissioners, to provide for the most efficient and
effective operation of the Office of the State Public Defender; and
(2) A report on the current number of contracts for public defense at-
torneys and an analysis of the efficiency and cost-effectiveness of transi-
tioning a portion or all of those contracted services to be performed by em-
ployees of the state public defender's office. Such analysis shall be de-
veloped in consultation with the respective district public defenders and
county commissioners.


SECTION 2. That Section 1-1105, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
1-1105. COPY OF RECORD -- EFFECT -- CHARGE FOR FURNISHING. 1. (1) It
shall be the duty of each reporter to furnish, upon order of the court entered
upon written application being made therefor by any attorney of record in a
suit, or any party to a suit, in which a stenographic record has been made,
a typewritten copy, or copies, of the record, or any part thereof, upon the
payment by such attorney, or party, of the cost thereof, as provided in sub-
section 2. (2) of this section, to such reporter, which payment shall be re-
tained by the reporter as a part of his compensation and in addition to his
salary allowed by section 1-1102, Idaho Code. Said copy, or copies, shall,
when properly certified by said reporter, constitute prima facie the minutes
of the court, and may be used on all motions for new trials, review or appeal,
when the minutes of the court may be used; and the cost of which may, when the
same is used on review or appeal, be charged as costs in a civil case against
the party finally defeated in the action.
2. (2) That in all actions such reporter shall charge and receive, and
retain as provided in subsection 1. (1) of this section, three dollars and
twenty-five cents ($3.25) per page for the transcript to be prepared in the
style and with the number of copies as directed by rule of the supreme court;
provided, however, that when such transcript is requested by a defendant
or his attorney on an appeal in a criminal action where after conviction,
it appears to the satisfaction of the district court that the accused is
poor and unable to procure such transcript, the court must direct payment to
such court reporter of the page charge in this subsection provided, from the
county treasury by the state public defender.
SECTION 3. That Section 16-2009, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
16-2009. HEARING. (1) Cases under this act shall be heard by the court
without a jury. The hearing may be conducted in an informal manner and may be
adjourned from time to time. Stenographic notes or mechanical recording of
the hearing shall be required. The general public shall be excluded and only
such persons admitted whose presence is requested by any person entitled to
notice under the provisions of section 16-2007, Idaho Code, or as the judge
shall find to have a direct interest in the case or in the work of the court;
provided that persons so admitted shall not disclose any information secured
at the hearing which would identify an individual child or parent. The court
may require the presence of witnesses deemed necessary to the disposition of
the petition, except that a parent who has executed a waiver pursuant to sec-
tion 16-2007, Idaho Code, shall not be required to appear at the hearing.
(2) The parent or guardian ad litem shall be notified as soon as prac-
ticable after the filing of a petition and prior to the start of a hearing
of his right to have counsel, and, if counsel is requested and the parent
or guardian is financially unable to employ counsel, counsel shall be pro-
vided only if such representation is constitutionally required. The pros-
ecuting attorneys of the several counties shall represent the department at
all stages of the hearing.


(3) The court's finding with respect to grounds for termination shall
be based upon clear and convincing evidence under rules applicable to the
trial of civil causes, provided that relevant and material information of
any nature, including that contained in reports, studies or examinations,
may be admitted and relied upon to the extent of its probative value. When
information contained in a report, study or examination is admitted in evi-
dence, the person making such report, study or examination shall be subject
to both direct and cross-examination.
SECTION 4. That Section 19-6005, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
19-6005. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE STATE PUBLIC DEFENDER. Consistent
with the state of Idaho's obligation to provide indigent public defense pur-
suant to the sixth amendment to the United States constitution; section 13,
article I of the constitution of the state of Idaho; and this chapter, the
state public defender shall have the power to:
(1) Ensure that qualified defending attorneys, experts, investiga-
tors, mitigation specialists, stenographers, paralegals, or other support
staff and assistants are employed or contracted as necessary to carry out the
purposes of this chapter, that the same deliver indigent defense services in
compliance with applicable indigent defense standards, and that any persons
hired or contracted to provided provide indigent individuals charged with an
offense or offenses punishable by a sentence of death be qualified to pro-
vide team representation. Provided, however, the terms of any contract with
a defending attorney shall not include any pricing structure that charges
or pays a single fixed fee for the services of the defending attorney and
client-related expenses;
(2) Provide appropriate facilities, including office space, furni-
ture, equipment, books and other legal research tools, postage, supplies,
and secure information and communication technology equipment that is rea-
sonably necessary for the proper performance of the state public defender;
(3) Implement procedures for the oversight, implementation, enforce-
ment, and improvement of indigent defense standards so that the right to
counsel of indigent persons is constitutionally delivered to all indigent
persons in this state;
(4) Implement the most current American bar association standards for
defending attorneys delivering indigent defense pursuant to this chapter,
including caseload standards; Collaborate with district public defenders to
establish Idaho standards for defending attorneys that, to the extent rea-
sonably practical and considering factors such as case complexity, support
services, and travel, utilize the following principles:
(a) The delivery of indigent defense services should be independent of
political and judicial influence, though the judiciary is encouraged to
contribute information and advice concerning the delivery of indigent
defense services;
(b) Defending attorneys should have sufficient time and private phys-
ical space so that attorney-client confidentiality is safeguarded dur-
ing meetings with clients;
(c) Defending attorneys' workloads should permit effective represen-
tation;


(d) Economic disincentives or incentives that impair defending attor-
neys' ability to provide effective representation should be avoided;
(e) Defending attorneys' abilities, training, and experience should
match the nature and complexity of the cases in which they provide ser-
vices, including but not limited to cases involving complex felonies,
juveniles, and child protection;
(f) The defending attorney assigned to a particular case should, to the
extent reasonably practicable, continuously oversee the representa-
tion of that case and appear at every substantive court hearing;
(g) There should be reasonable parity between defending attorneys and
prosecuting attorneys with respect to resources, staff, and facili-
ties;
(h) Defending attorneys shall be regularly reviewed and supervised for
compliance with indigent defense standards and, if applicable, compli-
ance with indigent defense standards as set forth in contractual provi-
sions; and
(i) Defending attorneys shall identify and resolve conflicts of in-
terest in conformance with the Idaho rules of professional conduct and
other applicable constitutional standards;
(5) Collaborate with district public defenders to establish and im-
plement Idaho-based workload standards for defending attorneys taking into
consideration the following factors:
(a) The education, training, abilities, and experience of the defend-
ing attorney;
(b) The number of cases assigned to the defending attorney; and
(c) Case complexity;
(5) (6) Provide training and continuing legal education approved by the
Idaho state bar for defending attorneys and employees that promotes compe-
tency and consistency in case types defended by the state public defender;
(6) (7) Require defending attorneys, contractors, and employees to
keep appropriate records, consistent with uniform data-reporting require-
ments, respecting each person to whom the state public defender is responsi-
ble for providing defense, including but not limited to caseload, workload,
and expenditures;
(7) (8) Establish uniform contracts both for contract defending attor-
neys, where utilized throughout the state or when caseload volumes require
their use, and for conflict defending attorneys, when carrying out the pur-
poses of this chapter. Contract pay rates shall be informed by the prevail-
ing statewide market rate, local market conditions, and case complexity;
(8) (9) Establish a uniform system for contracting with qualified at-
torneys to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including a system for ap-
plication, payment for services, and reimbursement; and
(9) (10) Collaborate with district public defenders on the policies of
the office and in the formation of a budget request sufficient to meet the
state's constitutional obligation to provide indigent services, which the
state public defender shall submit to the division of financial management
as required by law.; and
(10) (11) Seek reimbursement from any applicable federal funds at the
department of health and welfare for any allowable costs of representation
or administrative costs for any representation authorized by this chapter,


whether provided by employees of the office of the state public defender or
by contract.
SECTION 5. That Section 19-6006, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
19-6006. DISTRICT PUBLIC DEFENDER. (1) In each judicial district de-
scribed in chapter 8, title 1, Idaho Code, the state public defender shall
employ a district public defender. The district public defender must be an
employee of the office of the state public defender, meet and maintain the
qualifications set forth in section 19-6004(2), Idaho Code, and not engage
in any conduct prohibited by section 19-6004(3), Idaho Code, while employed
as district public defender. The district public defender may be removed by
the state public defender for failing to maintain the qualifications of the
position established in this section, for engaging in conduct prohibited by
this section, or for good cause shown. The duty station of each district pub-
lic defender must be within the judicial district that the district public
defender oversees.
(2) Under the direction and supervision of the state public defender,
each district public defender shall carry out the purposes of this chapter
in the judicial district, including supervising the defending attorneys,
investigators, administrative staff, and other personnel in that judicial
district, whether hired or contracted to work in that judicial district,
coordinating litigation within that judicial district, assuring compliance
with the provisions of section 19-6005, Idaho Code, as well as other duties
assigned by the state public defender.
(3) The district public defender shall be the principal liaison with
the administrative district judge, the trial court administrator, the
boards of county commissioners, county clerks, and county prosecutors on
administrative matters concerning the provision of public defense in the ju-
dicial district. Upon invitation, but not less than annually, the district
public defender shall report to each board of county commissioners within
the judicial district concerning public defense in the respective county.
SECTION 6. That Section 19-6008, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
19-6008. INDIGENT PUBLIC DEFENSE -- ROLE OF COUNTIES -- PUBLIC DEFENSE
COMMISSION RULES -- TRANSITION. (1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, on and after October 1, 2024:
(a) All counties are released from any further financial or legal obli-
gation to provide indigent public defense. On and after such date, the
state assumes the full financial and legal obligation to provide indi-
gent public defense pursuant to required by the sixth amendment to the
United States constitution and section 13, article I of the constitu-
tion of the state of Idaho.
(b) (2) This release of financial and legal obligation to provide in-
digent public defense includes the release of any requirement for counties:
to employ or contract with defending attorneys, investigators, social work-
ers, legal assistants, or other personnel necessary to provide indigent pub-
lic defense; to provide office furnishings, equipment, office materials,


or office supplies; to provide information technology equipment, informa-
tion technology software, communication equipment, communication software,
equipment, or software licenses or subscriptions; to provide general office
technology or equipment; or to assume any other expense necessary for indi-
gent defense services on and after October 1, 2024.
(c) (3) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, any county pro-
viding office space to a county office of public defense or a joint county
office of public defense as of January 1, 2023, shall continue to make avail-
able the same or substantially similar office space for the use of the office
of the state public defender until July 1, 2029, provided that:
(i) (a) Not later than January 1, 2027, the state public defender must
provide to the board of county commissioners of any county providing
office space to the office of the state public defender a facility
transition plan outlining the state public defender's intent to either
procure other office space to house defending attorneys or enter into a
contract with the board of county commissioners to lease office space
from the board of county commissioners necessary to house defending
attorneys;
(ii) (b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to obligate a board
of county commissioners to provide office space to the office of the
state public defender on and after July 1, 2029;
(iii) (c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the state public de-
fender from notifying a board of county commissioners that provides
office space to the office of the state public defender that the state
public defender no longer needs part or all of the space obligated by
this section prior to July 1, 2029. Such notice shall relieve the county
board of commissioners of the obligation to provide office space to the
office of the state public defender; and
(iv) (d) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, each county
must continue providing interviewing facilities in the county jail nec-
essary for carrying out the state public defender's responsibilities in
law.
(d) (4) The state public defender shall reimburse a board of county com-
missioners for any expenses incurred in providing such office space, includ-
ing but not limited to office furnishings, equipment, office materials, or
office supplies; information technology equipment, information technology
software, communication equipment, communication software, equipment, or
software licenses or subscriptions; or general office technology or equip-
ment or related expenses. Provided however, that counties providing such
office space shall be responsible for costs related to office utilities, of-
fice cleaning, building maintenance, snow removal, and repair and replace-
ment costs due to reasonable use of the office space. The board of county
commissioners and the state public defender shall annually enter into a mem-
orandum of understanding regarding the use of such office space.
(e) All administrative rules promulgated by the state public defense
commission shall be repealed in accordance with the provisions of chap-
ter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.
(2) To effectuate an orderly transition to the office of the state pub-
lic defender without unnecessary disruption of indigent defense services,
counties and defending attorneys shall not prohibit access by the state


public defender, or his designee, to information and data, including case
files, that are necessary to establish a statewide case management system or
for other administrative purposes in establishing the office of the state
public defender. The state public defender and any designee shall have the
ethical duty and legal obligation to maintain confidentiality and privacy
of any information learned or obtained during the course of transition to
the office of the state public defender while counties continue to provide
indigent defense services. The state public defender at his discretion may
require defending attorneys to use a case management system procured by the
state public defender at no expense to counties or defending attorneys.
(3) Upon termination of the public defense commission on July 1, 2024,
all property and full-time positions at the commission shall transfer to the
office of the state public defender.
(4) All administrative rules promulgated by the public defense commis-
sion shall remain in effect while counties continue to provide indigent de-
fense until October 1, 2024, when that obligation ends pursuant to this sec-
tion.
(5) To the greatest extent possible, the state public defender and dis-
trict public defenders shall provide the option to defending attorneys em-
ployed by a county office of public defender or joint office of public de-
fender on September 30, 2024, who meet the requirements and standards for de-
fending attorneys, as well as support staff, the opportunity to continue em-
ployment with the office of the state public defender working in the county
that previously employed them.
(6) District magistrates commissions shall coordinate with the state
public defender and begin the process of recruiting applicants, reviewing
candidates, and selecting each district public defender as soon as practica-
ble after July 1, 2024.
(7) In order to advise the state public defender and provide input from
counties and defending attorneys during the transition, the state public de-
fender shall appoint a volunteer transition advisory board to advise on mat-
ters related to the transition of public defense through October 1, 2024.
Board members shall be compensated as provided in section 59-509(a), Idaho
Code. The board shall be composed of:
(a) Two (2) representatives from the Idaho association of counties; and
(b) Seven (7) attorneys, with one (1) attorney from each judicial
district, whose practice, as certified by them at the time of their ap-
pointment, is predominately criminal defense, among whom not less than
three (3) must be defending attorneys who are employed by a county or
joint office of public defense, and not less than two (2) must be de-
fending attorneys who contract with counties to provide public defense
services.
SECTION 7. That Section 19-6009, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
19-6009. RIGHT TO COUNSEL OF INDIGENT PERSON -- REPRESENTATION AT ALL
STAGES OF CRIMINAL AND COMMITMENT PROCEEDINGS -- PAYMENT. (1) An indigent
person who is being detained by a law enforcement officer, who is confined
or is the subject of hospitalization proceedings pursuant to section 18-212,
66-322, 66-326, 66-329, 66-404 or 66-406, Idaho Code, or who is under formal


charge of having committed, or is being detained under a conviction of, a se-
rious crime is entitled:
(a) To be represented by an attorney to the same extent as a person hav-
ing his own counsel is so entitled; and
(b) To be provided with the necessary services and facilities of repre-
sentation, including investigation and other preparation. The attor-
ney, services and facilities, and the court costs shall be provided at
public expense to the extent that the person is, at the time the court
determines indigency pursuant to section 19-6011, Idaho Code, unable to
provide for their payment.
(2) An indigent person who is entitled to be represented by an attorney
under subsection (1) of this section is entitled:
(a) To be counseled and defended at all stages of the matter beginning
with the earliest time when a person providing his own counsel would be
entitled to be represented by an attorney and including revocation of
probation;
(b) To be represented in any appeal; and
(c) To be represented in any other post-conviction or post-commitment
proceeding that the attorney or the indigent person considers appro-
priate, unless the court in which the proceeding is brought determines
that it is not a proceeding that a reasonable person with adequate means
would be willing to bring at his own expense and is therefore a frivolous
proceeding.
(3) Upon a finding of indigency, representation by an attorney under
subsection (1) of this section shall include the following cases, excluding
those cases where the state appellate public defender has jurisdiction pur-
suant to section 19-5905, Idaho Code, and excluding those cases of guardian
ad litem representation pursuant to section 16-1614(4), Idaho Code:
(a) Felony and misdemeanor cases;
(b) Actions arising under the Idaho juvenile corrections act, chapter
5, title 20, Idaho Code;
(c) Proceedings under the uniform post-conviction procedure act, chap-
ter 49, title 19, Idaho Code;
(d) Civil contempt proceedings where incarceration is sought;
(e) Actions arising under the child protective act, chapter 16, title
16, Idaho Code, but excluding actions brought exclusively under chapter
20, title 16, Idaho Code; and
(f) Appeals from adjudicatory decrees or orders under section 16-1625,
Idaho Code.
(4) The office of the state public defender shall be required to provide
indigent defense services only in cases listed in subsection (3) of this sec-
tion, provided that such limitations shall not obligate a county to finance
or oversee indigent defense service for any action not provided for in this
chapter.
(4) (5) An indigent person's right to a benefit under subsection (1) or
(2) of this section is unaffected by his having provided a similar benefit at
his own expense, or by his having waived it, at an earlier stage.
SECTION 8. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.